Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-480
Operators' licenses; classification.

(1) Operators' licenses issued by the department pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act shall be classified as follows:

(a) Class O license. The operator's license which authorizes the person to whom it is issued to operate on highways any motor vehicle except a commercial motor vehicle or motorcycle;

(b) Class M license. The operator's license or endorsement on a Class O license, provisional operator's permit, learner's permit, school permit, or commercial driver's license which authorizes the person to whom it is issued to operate a motorcycle on highways;

(c) CDL-commercial driver's license. The operator's license which authorizes the person to whom it is issued to operate a class of commercial motor vehicle or any motor vehicle, except a motorcycle, on highways;

(d) CLP-commercial learner's permit. A permit which when carried with a Class O license authorizes an individual to operate a class of commercial motor vehicle when accompanied by a holder of a valid commercial driver's license for purposes of behind-the-wheel training. When issued to a commercial driver's license holder, a CLP-commercial learner's permit serves as authorization for accompanied behind-the-wheel training in a commercial motor vehicle for which the holder's current commercial driver's license is not valid;

(e) RCDL-restricted commercial driver's license. The class of commercial driver's license which authorizes a commercial motor vehicle operator described in section 60-4,146.01 to operate any Class B Heavy Straight Vehicle or Class C Small Vehicle commercial motor vehicle for purposes of a farm-related or ranch-related service industry as defined in such section within one hundred fifty miles of the employer's place of business or the farm or ranch currently being served as provided in such section or any other motor vehicle, except a motorcycle, on highways;

(f) POP-provisional operator's permit. A motor vehicle operating permit with restrictions issued pursuant to section 60-4,120.01 to a person who is at least sixteen years of age but less than eighteen years of age which authorizes the person to operate any motor vehicle except a commercial motor vehicle or motorcycle;

(g) SCP-school permit. A permit issued to a student between fourteen years and two months of age and sixteen years of age for the purpose of driving in accordance with the requirements of section 60-4,124;

(h) FMP-farm permit. A permit issued to a person for purposes of operating farm tractors and other motorized implements of farm husbandry on highways in accordance with the requirements of section 60-4,126;

(i) LPD-learner's permit. A permit issued in accordance with the requirements of section 60-4,123 to a person at least fifteen years of age which authorizes the person to operate a motor vehicle, except a commercial motor vehicle, for learning purposes when accompanied by a licensed operator who is at least twenty-one years of age and who possesses a valid operator's license issued by this state or another state;

(j) LPE-learner's permit. A permit issued to a person at least fourteen years of age which authorizes the person to operate a motor vehicle, except a commercial motor vehicle, while learning to drive in preparation for application for a school permit;

(k) EDP-employment driving permit. A permit issued to a person which authorizes the person to operate a motor vehicle, except a commercial motor vehicle, pursuant to the requirements of sections 60-4,129 and 60-4,130;

(l) IIP-ignition interlock permit. A permit issued to a person which authorizes the person to operate a motor vehicle, except a commercial motor vehicle, which is equipped with an ignition interlock device;

(m) MHP-medical hardship driving permit. A permit issued to a person which authorizes the person to operate a motor vehicle, except a commercial motor vehicle, pursuant to the requirements of sections 60-4,130.01 and 60-4,130.02; and

(n) SPP-24/7 sobriety program permit. A permit issued to a person which authorizes the person to operate a motor vehicle, except a commercial motor vehicle, pursuant to the 24/7 Sobriety Program Act.

(2) For purposes of this section, motorcycle does not include an autocycle.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 30;

Laws 1990, LB 980, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 105, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 420, § 4;

Laws 1998, LB 320, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 387, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 675, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB736, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 9;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 77;

Laws 2021, LB271, § 8;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 26.

24/7 Sobriety Program Act, see section 60-701.